Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.24, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Cannabis business location. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis business may not be located within 1,000 feet of a youth athletic facility. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "youth athletic facility" means an indoor facility regularly used by minors for the purpose of playing sports, participating in competitive athletics, or doing physical exercise. new text end